Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2584.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS FOR EMERALD ASH BORER FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given: new text end new text begin (1) "eligible costs" means costs incurred in 2020 or later for treating or removing a tree on residential or agricultural homestead property found to be infested by the emerald ash borer and has been required by state law or by municipal ordinance to be treated or removed; new text end new text begin (2) "eligible homeowner" means a homeowner who incurred eligible costs related to a tree on the homeowner's property; and new text end new text begin (3) "eligible local government" means: new text end new text begin (i) a town with a population of at least 10,000; new text end new text begin (ii) a statutory or home rule charter city; or new text end new text begin (iii) "Minnesota Tribal governments," as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 10.65, subdivision 2, clause (4). new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Aid program established; payment. new text end new text begin The commissioner of revenue must distribute aid to eligible local governments. The commissioner must certify the aid amount to be paid in 2026 to each eligible local government by January 31, 2026. The commissioner must make the full 2026 payment to each eligible local government by February 15, 2026. This program is not subject to retention of administrative costs under Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.98, subdivision 14. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Amount of aid. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of revenue must establish a process to allocate the amount of available aid to eligible local governments. The process must be an open application process for a merit-based competitive grant program. The grant program established under this subdivision must prioritize distributing aid to eligible local governments based on: new text end new text begin (1) the rate of emerald ash borer infestations on residential properties; new text end new text begin (2) the ability of the local government's residents to pay for eligible costs; and new text end new text begin (3) the population of the eligible local government. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner of revenue must consult with the commissioners of agriculture and natural resources when establishing the process required under this subdivision. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Eligible uses. new text end new text begin An eligible government must use aid received under this section to reimburse eligible homeowners with incomes below 200 percent of the official federal poverty guideline for their eligible costs. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of revenue for aid under this section. This is a onetime appropriation. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.98, subdivision 14, the Department of Revenue may retain up to three percent of this amount for costs incurred in administering the program. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end